Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Use of Prisoners in County Jails to Pick up Trash

§ 47-5-431.
Use of prisoners in county jails to pick up trash; earned time credit; escapes.

The sheriff may, in his discretion, use any person who has been convicted of a nonviolent felony and who is serving all or any part of his sentence in the county jail to pick up trash along public roads and state highways within the county.

County inmates performing work under this section shall be eligible for earned time credit in the same manner as state inmates. State inmates shall be eligible for earned time credit in the same manner as other inmates confined or detained in state prisons or other state correctional facilities.

Any inmate escaping while participating in the work described herein shall receive an additional five-year sentence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 47-5-433.
Use of State Highway vehicles to pick up trash bagged by inmates.

The State Highway Commission may furnish vehicles along state highways to pick up trash bagged by inmates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 343, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.